tests/kik.lexd
LEXICON VerbTenseAspect-E(3)
:{A}> <v><rempast>:{NULL} <perf>:>{Ĩ}t
:{A}> <v><rempast>:{NULL} <compl>:>{I}r
:{BLOCK}{A}> <v><rempast>:{NULL} <perf>:>{Ĩ}t
:{BLOCK}{A}> <v><rempast>:{NULL} <compl>:>{I}r
:{R}{A}> <v><nearpast>:{NULL} <perf>:>{Ĩ}t
:{R}{A}> <v><nearpast>:{NULL} <compl>:>{I}r
:{K}{Ũ}> <v><currpast>:{NULL} <perf>:>{Ĩ}t
:{NULL} <v><currpast>:{NULL} <compl>:>{I}r
:{NULL} <v><pres>:{NULL} <perf>:>{Ĩ}t

LEXICON VerbFinalVowel-A
:>{AA}
<pass>:>wo

LEXICON VerbFinalVowel-E
:>{EE}
<pass>:>wo

LEXICON VerbReflexive(2)
:{Ĩ}> <refl>:{NULL}
: :

PATTERN VerbSuffix
VerbRecip VerbIntens VerbMid VerbCaus VerbApp

LEXICON VerbRecip
<recip>:>{A}n
:

LEXICON VerbIntens
<intens>:>{Ĩ}rĩr
<intens>:>{Ũ}rũr
:

LEXICON VerbMid
<mid>:>{Ĩ}k
<mid><rev>:>{Ĩ}k>{Ũ}r
<mid><rev>:>{Ũ}k
<rev>:>{Ũ}r
:

LEXICON VerbCaus
<caus>:>{I}th
:

LEXICON VerbApp
<appl>:>{Ĩ}r
:

LEXICON VerbTrans
<trans>:>{I}
:

LEXICON VerbNeg1(2)
:n{D}> <neg>:{NULL}
: :

LEXICON VerbStem
cab:cab   # print
har:har   # prepare
ũkĩr:{Ũ}kĩr   # wake.up
tega:tega   # 
gan:gan   # narrate
rũg:{R}ũg   # jump
ag:{A}g   # fail
um:{U}m   # come.out
kiny:{K}iny   # arrive
kũr:{K}ũr   # grow
ũk:{Ũ}k   # come
in:{I}n   # sing
thi:th{II}   # go
thi:th{I}   # go
thom:thom   # read
thamb:thamb
rĩm:{R}ĩm   # cultivate
haic:haic
on:{O}n
ror:{R}or
gũ:g{Ũ}   # fall
ũr:{Ũ}r   # run away
cok:{C}ok   # return
cooker:{C}ooker   # say(?) (meaning is  fairly confusing, but common in Bible)
ik:{I}k   # throw
nyit:nyit   # catch
tin:tin   # cut
hanyũk:hanyũk   # run
ikar:ikar   # stay/sit
rĩ:{R}{Ĩ}   # eat
ririkan:{R}irikan   # remember
ĩtĩk:{Ĩ}tĩk   # believe
iy:{I}y   # steal
igu:{I}g{U}   # hear / obey
ug:{U}g   # say
ĩr:{Ĩ}r   # tell
dũm:dũm   # send
tuĩk:{T}uĩk   # become
end:{E}nd   # want
thambĩr:thambĩr   # swim
ringĩr:{R}ingĩr   # persuade
hing:hing   # close
amb:{A}mb   # start
ĩrĩgĩr:{Ĩ}rĩgĩr   # intend
ĩtĩkĩr:{Ĩ}tĩkĩr   # allow
rut:{R}ut   # learn, teach, or remove
ribot:{R}ibot   # report
anĩrĩr:{A}nĩrĩr   # announce
ĩcir:{Ĩ}cir   # think
ĩtu:{Ĩ}t{U}   # pretend
rot:{R}ot   # dream
ĩrir:{Ĩ}rir   # regret
ken:{K}en   # be happy
rakar:{R}akar   # be angry
ĩhok:{Ĩ}hok   # hope
no:n{O}   # can/must (?)
hot:hot   # might
tũm:{T}ũm
ũm:{Ũ}m   # dry
h[-fvE]:h   # give
hith:hith   # hide
humb:humb   # cover
ĩk:{tĨ}k   # put
thek:thek   # laugh
tah:tah   # fetch
ihũg:{I}hũg   # to get wet
heenere:heenere   # deceive
tũũr:tũũr   # live (or live somewhere)
nyu:nyu   # drink
it:{I}t   # pour
ur:{U}r   # rain
hũr:hũr   # beat
tig:{T}ig   # leave
on:{O}n   # see
ĩt:{Ĩ}t   # call
hĩtũki:hĩtũk{I}   # pass (exceed)
twar:{T}war   # take, or drive
ku:k{U}   # die
ũri:{Ũ}r{I}   # ask
maki:mak{I}   # scare
hot:hot   # can (as in be able)
ig:ig   # put
rath:rath   # predict
ĩk:{Ĩ}k   # do
bay:bay   # wrap
thir:thir   # fail
onek:{O}nek   # appear
meny:meny   # know
ambatĩri:{A}mbatĩr{I}   # advance (in status)
rũgam:rũgam   # stand
ken:ken   # rejoice
maki:mak{I}   # surprise
cari:car{I}   # search
amũkĩr:{A}mũkĩr   # accept
reki:rek{I}   # send
ũmb:{Ũ}mb   # create (make)
ari:{A}r{I}   # discuss
tu:t{U}   # decide
ĩhũg:{Ĩ}hũg   # watch
reg:reg   # refuse
iki:{I}k{I}   # throw
tigithani:tigithan{I}   # separate
buĩri:buĩr{I}   # disappear
end:{E}nd   # love
ĩti:{Ĩ}t{I}   # to plead (as in plead guilty)
niin:niin   # finish
ĩhumb:{Ĩ}humb   # wear
kuu:ku{U}   # carry
thuurũkani:thuurũkan{I}   # analyse
haragani:haragan{I}   # disperse
kaani:kaan{I}   # prohibit
geri:ger{I}   # try
cay:{C}ay   # complain
rathim:rathim   # bless
rĩmi:rĩm{I}   # earn
giũr:giũr   # trample
rot:rot   # dream
kor:{K}or   # find

PATTERNS
AdjPrefix(1) AdjRoot AdjAgree AdjPrefix(2)

LEXICON AdjPrefix(2)
:m{Ũ} <cl1><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:a <cl1><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{Ũ} <cl3><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:mĩ <cl3><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{RRI}{IRI} <cl5><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:ma <cl5><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}ĩ <cl7><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{N}{N2}{N3} <cl7><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{N}{N2}{N3} <cl9p6><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:ma <cl9p6><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{N}{N2}{N3} <cl9p10><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{N}{N2}{N3} <cl9p10><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:rũ <cl11p6><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:ma <cl11p6><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:rũ <cl11p10><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{N}{N2}{N3} <cl11p10><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:ka <cl12p6><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:ma <cl12p6><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}a <cl12p13><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:t{Ũ} <cl12p13><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{Ũ} <cl14><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{Ũ} <cl14><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:ma <cl14><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}{Ũ} <cl15><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:ma <cl15><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:h{A} <cl16><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}{Ũ} <cl17><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:g{U} <cl17><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}

LEXICON AdjRoot
nene:nene  # big
kũrũ:{K}ũrũ  # old
ega:{E}ga  # good
tune:{T}une  # red
rũarũ:rũarũ  # sick
nini:nini  # small/young
erũ:{E}rũ  # neq
ũru:{Ũ}ru  # bad
erũ:{E}rũ  # white
athĩki:{A}thĩki  # obedient
kuhĩ:{K}uhĩ  # short
kenge:{K}enge  # baby
thaka:thaka  # beautiful
irũ:{I}rũ  # black
raihu:raihu  # tall
mata:mata  # thick, creamy (possibly sour?)
ingĩ:{I}ngĩ  # many
othe:{O}the  # all

LEXICON AdjAgree
<adj>:{NULL}

LEXICON Assoc

a<assoc><cl1><sg>:wa
a<assoc><cl1><pl>:a
a<assoc><cl3><sg>:wa
a<assoc><cl3><pl>:ya
a<assoc><cl5><sg>:rĩa
a<assoc><cl5><pl>:ma
a<assoc><cl9p6><pl>:ma
a<assoc><cl11p6><pl>:ma
a<assoc><cl7><sg>:kĩa
a<assoc><cl7><pl>:cia
a<assoc><cl9p6><sg>:ya
a<assoc><cl9p10><sg>:ya
a<assoc><cl9p10><pl>:cia
a<assoc><cl11p10><pl>:cia
a<assoc><cl11p6><sg>:rũa
a<assoc><cl11p6><sg>:rwa # alternate, possibly biblical form 
a<assoc><cl11p10><sg>:rũa
a<assoc><cl12p13><sg>:ka
a<assoc><cl12p13><pl>:tũa
a<assoc><cl14><sg>:wa
a<assoc><cl14><pl>:ma
a<assoc><cl15><sg>:kũa
a<assoc><cl15><pl>:ma

PATTERNS
Assoc
PersPro # personal pronouns
DepPro DepProEnds # dependent pronouns ("and/with X")
PossPro PossProOwner # possessive pronouns (follow nouns)
RelPro # relative pronouns (relativize nouns)
#DemPro # demonstrative pronouns (that one, etc.)
DistDem
ProxDem
AnaDem

LEXICON PersPro

pro<prn><pers><p1><sg>:niũ
pro<prn><pers><p1><pl>:ithuĩ
pro<prn><pers><p2><sg>:weũ
pro<prn><pers><p2><pl>:inyuũ
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl1><sg>:we
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl1><pl>:mo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl3><sg>:guo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl3><pl>:yo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl5><sg>:rĩo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl5><pl>:mo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl7><sg>:kĩo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl7><pl>:cio
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl9p10><sg>:yo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl9p10><pl>:cio
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl11p6><sg>:ruo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl11p6><pl>:mo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl11p10><sg>:ruo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl11p10><pl>:cio
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl12p13><sg>:ko
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl12p13><pl>:tuo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl14><sg>:guo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl14><pl>:mo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl15><sg>:kuo
pro<prn><pers><p3><cl15><pl>:mo

LEXICON DepProEnds

<p1><sg>:niĩ
<p1><pl>:ithuĩ
<p2><sg>:we
<p2><pl>:inyuĩ
<p3><cl1><sg>:ke
<p3><cl1><sg>:ake # alternate form, possibly biblical
<p3><cl1><pl>:o
<p3><cl3><sg>:guo
<p3><cl3><pl>:yo
<p3><cl5><sg>:rĩo
<p3><cl5><pl>:mo
<p3><cl7><sg>:kĩo
<p3><cl7><pl>:cio
<p3><cl9p10><sg>:yo
<p3><cl9p10><pl>:cio
<p3><cl11p6><sg>:ruo
<p3><cl11p6><pl>:mo
<p3><cl11p10><sg>:ruo
<p3><cl11p10><pl>:cio
<p3><cl12p13><sg>:ko
<p3><cl12p13><pl>:tuo
<p3><cl14><sg>:guo
<p3><cl14><pl>:mo
<p3><cl15><sg>:kuo
<p3><cl15><pl>:mo

LEXICON DepPro

pro<prn><dep>:na

LEXICON PossPro

pro<prn><poss><cl1><sg>:w{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl1><pl>:{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl3><sg>:w{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl3><pl>:y{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl5><sg>:rĩ{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl5><pl>:m{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl7><sg>:gĩ{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl7><pl>:ci{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl9p6><sg>:y{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl9p6><pl>:m{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl9p10><sg>:y{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl9p10><pl>:ci{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl11p6><sg>:rũ{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl11p6><pl>:m{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl11p10><sg>:rũ{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl11p10><pl>:ci{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl12p6><sg>:g{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl12p6><pl>:m{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl12p13><sg>:g{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl12p13><pl>:tũ{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl14><sg>:w{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl14><pl>:m{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl15><sg>:gũ{A}>
pro<prn><poss><cl15><pl>:m{A}>

LEXICON PossProOwner

<sp1><ssg>:{A}kwa
<sp1><spl>:{I}tũ
<sp2><ssg>:{A}ku
<sp2><spl>:{A}nyu
<sp3><scl1><ssg>:{A}ke
<sp3><scl1><spl>:{A}o

LEXICON RelPro

pro<prn><rel><cl1><sg>:ũrĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl1><pl>:{A}rĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl3><sg>:ũrĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl3><pl>:ĩrĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl5><sg>:rĩrĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl5><pl>:m{A}rĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl7><sg>:kĩrĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl7><pl>:irĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl9p6><sg>:ĩria
pro<prn><rel><cl9p6><pl>:m{A}rĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl9p10><sg>:irĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl9p10><pl>:iria
pro<prn><rel><cl11p6><sg>:rũrĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl11p6><pl>:m{A}rĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl11p10><sg>:rũrĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl11p10><pl>:iria
pro<prn><rel><cl12p6><sg>:k{A}rĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl12p6><pl>:m{A}rĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl12p13><sg>:k{A}rĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl12p13><pl>:tũrĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl14><sg>:ũrĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl14><pl>:m{A}rĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl15><sg>:kũrĩa
pro<prn><rel><cl15><pl>:m{A}rĩa

LEXICON DistDem

pro<prn><dem><dist><cl1><sg>:ũrĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl1><pl>:{A}rĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl3><sg>:ũrĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl3><pl>:ĩrĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl5><sg>:rĩrĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl5><pl>:m{A}rĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl7><sg>:kĩrĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl7><pl>:irĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl9p6><sg>:ĩria
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl9p6><pl>:m{A}rĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl9p10><sg>:irĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl9p10><pl>:iria
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl11p6><sg>:rũrĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl11p6><pl>:m{A}rĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl11p10><sg>:rũrĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl11p10><pl>:iria
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl12p6><sg>:k{A}rĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl12p6><pl>:m{A}rĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl12p13><sg>:k{A}rĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl12p13><pl>:tũrĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl14><sg>:ũrĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl14><pl>:m{A}rĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl15><sg>:kũrĩa
pro<prn><dem><dist><cl15><pl>:m{A}rĩa

LEXICON ProxDem

pro<prn><dem><prox><cl1><sg>:ũyũ
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl1><pl>:aya
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl3><sg>:ũyũ
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl3><pl>:ĩno
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl5><sg>:rĩrĩ
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl5><pl>:maya
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl7><sg>:gĩkĩ
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl7><pl>:ici
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl9p6><sg>:ĩno
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl9p6><pl>:maya
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl9p10><sg>:ĩno
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl9p10><pl>:ici
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl11p6><sg>:rũrũ
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl11p6><pl>:maya
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl11p10><sg>:rũrũ
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl11p10><pl>:ici
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl12p6><sg>:gaka
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl12p6><pl>:maya
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl12p13><sg>:gaka
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl12p13><pl>:tũtũ
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl14><sg>:ũyũ
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl14><pl>:maya
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl15><sg>:gũkũ
pro<prn><dem><prox><cl15><pl>:maya

LEXICON AnaDem
